Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5763.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8501a. As used in this part: (a) "Mixed fertilizer" means a fertilizer containing that contains any combination or mixture of fertilizer materials. (b) "Mixed soil product" means a product made of mixed or combined soil amendments that does not make general nutrient value statements or specific nutrient value claims and is not subject to the registration or inspection fees under sections 8505 and 8506. (c) (b) "Nitrogen fertilizer" means a fertilizer that contains nitrogen as a component. (d) (c) "Official sample" means a sample of fertilizer taken by a representative of the department of agriculture and rural development in accordance with acceptable sampling methods under section 8510. (e) (d) "Order" means a cease and desist order issued under section 8511. (f) (e) "Package" or "packaged" means any type of product regulated by this part that is distributed in individual labeled containers. (g) (f) "Percent" and "percentage" mean the percentage by weight. (h) (g) "Person" means an individual, partnership, association, firm, limited liability company, or corporation. (i) (h) "Primary nutrients" means total nitrogen, available phosphate, or soluble potash, or any combination of those nutrients. (j) (i) "Registrant" means the person who that registers a product under this part. (k) "Soil amendment" means any material used or intended to be used in or on soil that may improve the property of the soil but does not make any specific or direct claims to improve the property of the soil and is not subject to the registration or inspection fees under sections 8505 and 8506. Soil amendment includes, but is not limited to, sand, gravel, woodchips, grass clippings, straw, sulfur, gypsum, topsoil, unmanipulated manure, and composted products that do not make general nutrient value statements or specific nutrient value claims. (l) (j) "Soil conditioner" means any substance that is used or intended for use to improve the physical characteristics of soil, including, but not limited to, materials such as peat moss and peat products, composted products that make general nutrient value statements, synthetic soil conditioners, or other products that are worked into the soil or are applied on the surface to improve the properties of the soil for enhancing to enhance plant growth. Soil conditioner does not include guaranteed plant nutrients, a composted product that makes a specific nutrient value claim, agricultural liming materials, pesticides, unmanipulated animal or vegetable manures, hormones, bacterial inoculants, and products used in directly influencing or controlling plant growth. A soil conditioner for which claims are made of that makes a specific nutrient value claim is considered a fertilizer for the purposes of this part. (m) (k) "Specialty fertilizer" means any fertilizer distributed primarily for nonfarm use, such as use in connection with home gardens, lawns, shrubbery, flowers, golf courses, parks, and cemeteries, and may include fertilizers used for research or experimental purposes. (n) (l) "Ton" means a net weight of 2,000 pounds avoirdupois. (o) "Unmanipulated manure" means an animal or vegetable manure that is not ground, pelletized, mechanically dried, packaged, or supplemented with plant nutrients other than phosphorous. Unmanipulated manure is considered a soil amendment for purposes of this part and is not subject to registration or inspection fees under sections 8505 and 8506. (p) (m) "Use" means the loading, mixing, applying, storing, transporting, or disposing of a fertilizer. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5761 (request no. H02104'25). (b) House Bill No. 5762 (request no. H03967'25).